Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.510

Physical therapy licensure compact—Compact privilege—Fees.

(1) The secretary, in consultation with the board, shall establish fees pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 for physical therapists and physical therapist assistants seeking to practice in this state by use of compact privilege as defined in RCW 18.74.500. At the time of applying for compact privilege in this state, the applicant shall comply with established fee requirements.

(2) The fees established in subsection (1) of this section must be an amount sufficient to cover the state's monetary obligations as a member state to the physical therapy licensure compact.

[ 2017 c 108 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2017 c 108 ss 1 and 2: See note following RCW 18.74.500.